src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/uk/hyphenation/hyph_uk.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2а1
2а3а1
а3е1
а3і1
а3о1
а3у1
а3ю1
а3я1
а3є1
а3ї1
2е1
е3а1
2е3е1
е3і1
е3о1
е3у1
е3ю1
е3я1
е3є1
е3ї1
2и1
и3а1
и3е1
и3і1
и3о1
и3у1
и3ю1
и3я1
и3є1
и3ї1
2і1
і3а1
і3е1
і3и1
і3о1
і3у1
і3ю1
і3я1
і3є1
і3ї1
2о1
о3а1
о3е1
о3і1
2о3о1
о3у1
о3ю1
о3я1
о3є1
о3ї1
2у1
у3а1
у3е1
у3і1
у3о1
2у3у1
у3ю1
у3я1
у3є1
у3ї1
2ю1
ю3а1
ю3е1
ю3і1
ю3о1
ю3у1
2ю3ю1
ю3я1
ю3є1
ю3ї1
2я1
я3а1
я3е1
я3о1
я3у1
я3ю1
2я3я1
я3є1
я3ї1
2є1
є3у1
є3ю1
2є3є1
є3ї1
2ї1
ї3е1
ї3о1
ї3ю1
2б1к
2б1п
2б1с
2б1т
2б1ф
2б1х
2б1ц
2б1ч
2б1ш
2б1щ
2в1б
2в1г
2в1д
2в1ж
2в1з
2в1к
2в1л
2в1м
2в1н
2в1п
2в1р
2в1с
2в1т
2в1ф
2в1х
2в1ц
2в1ч
2в1ш
2в1щ
2в1й
2в6'3
2в6’3
2г1к
2г1п
2г1с
2г1т
2г1ф
2г1ц
2г1ч
2г1ш
2д1к
2д1п
2д1с
2д1т
2д1ф
2д1х
2д1ц
2д1ч
2д1ш
2д1щ
2ж1к
2ж1п
2ж1с
2ж1т
2ж1ф
2ж1х
2ж1ц
2ж1ч
2ж1ш
2з1к
2з1п
2з1с
2з1т
2з1ф
2з1х
2з1ц
2з1ч
2з1ш
2з1щ
2к1б
2к1г
2к1д
2к1з
2л1б
2л1в
2л1г
2л1ґ
2л1д
2л1ж
2л1з
2л1к
2л1м
2л1н
2л1п
2л1р
2л1с
2л1т
2л1ф
2л1х
2л1ц
2л1ч
2м1б
2м1в
2м1г
2м1д
2м1ж
2м1з
2м1к
2м1л
2м1н
2м1п
2м1р
2м1с
2м1т
2м1ф
2м1х
2м1ц
2м1ч
2м1ш
2м1щ
2м6'3
2м6’3
2н1б
2н1в
2н1г
2н1д
2н1ж
2н1з
2н1к
2н1л
2н1м
2н1п
2н1р
2н1с
2н1т
2н1ф
2н1х
2н1ц
2н1ч
2н1ш
2н1щ
2н6'3
2н6’3
2п1б
2п1д
2п1з
2р1б
2р1в
2р1г
2р1ґ
2р1д
2р1ж
2р1з
2р1к
2р1л
2р1м
2р1н
2р1п
2р1с
2р1т
2р1ф
2р1х
2р1ц
2р1ч
2р1ш
2р1щ
2р1й
2р6'3
2р6’3
2с1б
2с1г
2с1д
2т1б
2т1г
2т1д
2т1ж
2т1з
2ф1б
2ф1г
2ф1з
2х1г
2х1д
2ц1б
2ц1г
2ц1д
2ц1з
2ч1б
2ч1д
2ч1ж
2ш1б
2ш1г
2й1б
2й1в
2й1г
2й1д
2й1ж
2й1з
2й1к
2й1л
2й1м
2й1н
2й1п
2й1р
2й1с
2й1т
2й1ф
2й1х
2й1ц
2й1ч
2й1ш
2й1щ
2дь1к
д6ь
2дь1с
2дь1т
2дь1ц
2зь1к
з6ь
2зь1с
2зь1т
2ль1б
л6ь
2ль1в
2ль1г
2ль1д
2ль1ж
2ль1з
2ль1к
2ль1м
2ль1н
2ль1п
2ль1р
2ль1с
2ль1т
2ль1ф
2ль1х
2ль1ц
2ль1ч
2ль1ш
2ль1щ
2ль1й
2нь1б
н6ь
2нь1г
2нь1з
2нь1к
2нь1л
2нь1м
2нь1с
2нь1т
2нь1х
2нь1ц
2нь1ч
2нь1ш
2нь1й
2рь1к
р6ь
2рь1ц
2сь1б
с6ь
2сь1д
2ть1б
т6ь
2к1сп
2к1ст
2к1ськ
кс6ь
2п1сп
2п1ст
2п1ськ
пс6ь
2с1пк
2с2п1п
2с1пс
2с1пт
2с1пх
2с1пч
2с1с
2с1ськ
сс6ь
2с1тк
2с1тп
2с1тс
2с1тс6ь
2с2т1т
2с1тф
2с1тц
2с1шт
2сь2к1к
2сь1кс
2сь1кт
2т1ск
2т1сп
2т1ст
2т1ськ
тс6ь
2т1шк
2ф1сп
2ф1ст
2ф1ськ
фс6ь
2ф1шт
2х1ст
2х1ськ
хс6ь
2ц1ст
2ц1шк
2ш1тк
2ш1тс6ь
2б1б
2в1в
2г1г
2ґ1ґ
2д1д
2ж1ж
2з1з
2к1к
2л1л
2м1м
2н1н
2п1п
2р1р
2т1т
2ф1ф
2х1х
2ц1ц
2ч1ч
2ш1ш
2щ1щ
2й1й
3нн2я1
3тт2я1
3тт2ю1
3лл2я1
3лл2є1
3лл2ю1
3дд2я1
д4ж
д4з
а2й
е2й
и2й
і2й
о2й
у2й
ю2й
я2й
є2й
ї2й
3й6о1
6ь
ь6о1
6'
6’
.б6'8
.б6’8
.в6'8
.в6’8
.д6'8
.д6’8
.з6'8
.з6’8
.м6'8
.м6’8
.н6'8
.н6’8
.п6'8
.п6’8
.р6'8
.р6’8
.т6'8
.т6’8
.ф6'8
.ф6’8
.ш6'8
.ш6’8
.бд6
.бр6
.в1б6
.вб6'6
.вб6’6
.в2в6'6
.в1в
.в2в6’6
.в1г6
.в1д6
.в1ж6
.в1з6
.вз6д6
.в1к6
.в1л6
.в1м6
.в2м6'6
.в2м6’6
.в1п6
.вп6'6
.вп6’6
.вп6х6
.в1с6
.вс6т6
.в1т6
.вш6к6
.в1ш
.д4ж6
.д4з6
.дл6
.д1с6
.зб6
.з2в6'6
.з2в6’6
.зг6
.зд6
.зд6з6
.зл6
.з2м6'6
.з2м6’6
.з1с6
.зс6к6
.зс6т6
.з1ч6
.з1ш6
.зш6к6
.зґ6
.й1ш6
.кл6
.кп6
.кс6
.кх6
.кш6
.лк6с6
.л1к
.л1с6
.л6ь6
.м1с6
.м1ф6
.н1б6
.пр6
.пс6
.пх6
.р1т6
.ск6
.ск6л6
.сл6
.сп6
.сп6'6
.сп6’6
.сп6л6
.с1п6х6
.ст6
.сх6
.сх6л6
.тк6
.тр6
.тх6
.т6ь6
.фл6
.хл6
.ц6ь6
.чх6
.шк6
.шл6
.шп6
.шт6
6бв.
6бз.
6бй.
6бл.
6б6ль.
бл6ь
6бн.
6бр.
6бс.
6б6ст.
6б6с6тв.
6б6с6тр.
6б6с6ьк.
бс6ь
6б6ць.
бц6ь
6вб.
6вв.
6вд.
6в6др.
6в6дь.
вд6ь
6вж.
6вз.
6в6зь.
вз6ь
6вй.
6вк.
6вл.
6в6ль.
вл6ь
6вм.
6вн.
6вп.
6вр.
6вс.
6в6с6тв.
6в6с6ть.
вст6ь
6в6сь.
вс6ь
6в6с6ьк.
6вт.
6вх.
6в6ць.
вц6ь
6вч.
6вш.
6вщ.
6гв.
6гг.
6гд.
6гл.
6г6ль.
гл6ь
6гм.
6гн.
6гр.
6гс.
6г6с6тв.
6г6сь.
гс6ь
6гт.
6дж.
6дз.
6д6зь.
дз6ь
6дл.
6дм.
6дн.
6др.
6д6с6тв.
6д6с6ьк.
дс6ь
6дт.
6дь.
6д6ь6сь.
дьс6ь
6жб.
6жв.
6ж6дь.
жд6ь
6ж6сь.
жс6ь
6зв.
6зг.
6зд.
6з6дв.
6з6дн.
6з6дь.
зд6ь
6зк.
6зл.
6зм.
6зн.
6з6нь.
зн6ь
6зр.
6з6сь.
зс6ь
6зь.
6з6ьб.
6з6ьк.
6йб.
6йв.
6йг.
6йд.
6йз.
6йк.
6й6кл.
6йл.
6й6ль.
йл6ь
6йм.
6й6мс.
й2м1с
6йн.
6й6нс.
й2н1с
6йп.
6йр.
6йс.
6й6ст.
6й6с6тв.
6й6с6тр.
6й6сь.
йс6ь
6й6с6ьк.
6йт.
6й6тс.
6йф.
6йх.
6йц.
6йч.
6йш.
6кв.
6кк.
6кл.
6к6ль.
кл6ь
6кр.
6кс.
6к6ст.
6к6сь.
6кт.
6к6тр.
6кх.
6кш.
6лб.
6лг.
6лд.
6лк.
6лл.
6л6ль.
лл6ь
6лм.
6л6мс.
л2м1с
6лн.
6лп.
6лс.
6лт.
6л6хв.
6ль.
6л6ьб.
6л6ьв.
6л6ьг.
6л6ьд.
6л6ь6дс.
ль2д1с
6л6ьз.
6л6ьк.
6л6ьм.
6л6ьн.
6л6ьп.
6л6ьс.
6л6ь6с6тв.
6л6ь6сь.
л6ьс6ь
6л6ь6с6ьк.
6л6ьт.
6л6ь6тр.
6л6ьф.
6л6ьх.
6л6ьц.
6л6ьч.
6л6ьш.
6л6ьщ.
6мб.
6м6б6ль.
мбл6ь
6м6бр.
6мг.
6мж.
6мк.
6мл.
6м6ль.
мл6ь
6мм.
6мн.
6мп.
6мр.
6мс.
6м6с6тв.
6м6сь.
мс6ь
6м6с6ьк.
6мт.
6мф.
6мх.
6мш.
6нв.
6нг.
6н6гл.
6н6г6ль.
нгл6ь
6н6гр.
6н6гс.
н2г1с
6нд.
6н6дж.
нд4ж
6н6дз.
нд4з
6н6дп.
н2д1п
6н6др.
6нж.
6нз.
6нк.
6н6кс.
6н6кт.
6нм.
6нн.
6нр.
6нс.
6н6ск.
6н6ст.
6н6с6тв.
6н6с6тр.
6н6с6ьк.
нс6ь
6н6с6ькй.
6нт.
6н6тк.
6н6тр.
6н6т6с6тв.
н2т1ст
6н6ть.
нт6ь
6нф.
6нх.
6нц.
6н6ць.
нц6ь
6нч.
6нш.
6нь.
6н6ьб.
6н6ьг.
6н6ьк.
6н6ь6сь.
ньс6ь
6пд.
6пл.
6пр.
6пс.
6п6с6тв.
6п6сь.
6пт.
6п6тр.
6пф.
6пц.
6рб.
6рв.
6рг.
6рд.
6р6дв.
6р6дж.
рд4ж
6р6дь.
рд6ь
6рж.
6рз.
6р6зн.
6р6зь.
рз6ь
6рк.
6р6кс.
6р6кт.
6рл.
6р6ль.
рл6ь
6р6л6ьз.
р2ль1з
6рм.
6рн.
6р6нс.
р2н1с
6р6н6ст.
6р6нь.
рн6ь
6рп.
6рр.
6рс.
6р6ср.
6р6ст.
6р6с6тв.
6р6с6ть.
рст6ь
6р6сь.
рс6ь
6р6с6ьк.
6рт.
6р6тв.
6р6тр.
6р6ть.
рт6ь
6рф.
6рх.
6рц.
6р6ць.
рц6ь
6рч.
6рш.
6рщ.
6р6щ6сь.
рщс6ь
6рь.
6с6дп.
с2д1п
6с6д6рп.
сд2р1п
6ск.
6сл.
6с6ль.
сл6ь
6см.
6сн.
6сп.
6сс.
6ст.
6с6тв.
6с6тй.
6с6тм.
6с6тр.
6с6т6рь.
стр6ь
6с6ть.
ст6ь
6с6ць.
сц6ь
6сь.
6с6ьб.
6с6ьк.
6с6ьм.
6тв.
6т6вт.
т2в1т
6т6зт.
т2з1т
6тл.
6т6ль.
тл6ь
6тм.
6т6мр.
т2м1р
6тр.
6тс.
6т6с6тв.
6т6с6ьк.
6тт.
6тц.
6тч.
6ть.
6т6ь6сь.
тьс6ь
6фм.
6фр.
6ф6с6тв.
6фт.
6ф6ть.
фт6ь
6фф.
6фь.
ф6ь
6хв.
6хм.
6хн.
6хр.
6хт.
6хш.
6ц6тв.
6ць.
ц6ь
6ц6ьк.
6чб.
6чм.
6чн.
6чт.
6шв.
6ш6ль.
шл6ь
6шм.
6шн.
6ш6нл.
ш2н1л
6ш6сь.
шс6ь
6шт.
6ш6тв.
6щ6сь.
щс6ь
.бе4з3
.бе4з6'3
.б2е1
.бе4з6’3
.без2у4
.бе5з4о3д
.без2о1
.без5о4соб
.безос2о1
.безві4д3
.безв2і1
.без3ро4з3
.безр2о1
ви3ї4
в2и1
.ві4д3
.ві5д4ом
.в2і1
.від2о1
.ві5д4озв
.ві5д4ун
.від2у1
віду4ч
в2і1
від2у1
.ві5д4а1
.ві5д4ер
.від2е1
.в2і5д4і1
.від6'3
.від6’3
.мі4ж3
.м2і1
безві4д3
б2е1
безв2і1
ові4д3
ов2і1
ді4єві4д3
д2і1
ді3є1
дієв2і1
за4вві4д3
з2а1
за2в1в
завв2і1
неві4д3
неві4д6'3
н2е1
нев2і1
неві4д6’3
3п4р2о1
про4ф3ві4д3
профв2і1
спе4ц3ві4д3
сп2е1
спецв2і1
3с4п2і1
співві4д3
спі2в1в
співв2і1
те4х3ві4д3
т2е1
техв2і1
.п2е1р2е3
.пере4д3бач
.п2е1
.передб2а1
.пере4д3виб
.передв2и1
.пере4д3г
.пере4д3д
.пере4д3м
.пере4д3ост
.перед2о1
.пере4д3пл2а1
.пере2д1п
.пере4д3пок
.передп2о1
.пере4д3р
.пере4д3св
.пере2д1с
.пере4д5у4мов
.перед2у1
.передум2о1
.пере4д3ус2і1
.пере4д3фр
.пере2д1ф
.пере4д3ч
.пере4д6'3
.пере4д6’3
.пона4д3
.п2о1
.пон2а1
.пона5д4і1
.пона5д4и1
.пона5д4я1
3п4р2е1
3п4р2и1
при3ї4
3п4р2і1
.пі4д3
.пі5д4о1
.п2і1
.п2і5д4і1
.під6'3
.під6’3
.пі5д4е1
.пі5д4и1
.пі5д4у1
.пі4в3
.спі4в3
.с4п2і1
.напі4в3
.н2а1
.нап2і1
.ро4з3
.ро5з4і1
.р2о1
.ро5з4е1
ро5з4йом
р2о1
р2о1з3й6о1
.ро5з4а1
.ро4з6'3
.ро4з6’3
.чере4з3
.чере4з6'3
.ч2е1
.ч2е1р2е1
.чере4з6’3
оо4б
ооб6'3
ооб6’3
ооб3м
2о2о1б3р2о1
об6'3
об6’3
од6'3
од6’3
на4д6'3
н2а1
на4д6’3
за5о4р
за3о1
до5о4р
д2о1
д2о3о1
по5о4р
п2о1
п2о3о1
пере5о4р
п2е1
п2е1р2е1
пере3о1
пі6д5о4р
п2і1
під2о1
бе4з5і4де2й
без2і1
безід2е1
до3в'4є1
до2в6'3
до3в’4є1
до2в6’3
за3в'4є1
за2в6'3
за3в’4є1
за2в6’3
зі3в'4є1
з2і1
зі2в6'3
зі3в’4є1
зі2в6’3
обі3в'4є1
об2і1
обі2в6'3
обі3в’4є1
обі2в6’3
по3в'4є1
по2в6'3
по3в’4є1
по2в6’3
уі3в'4є1
уі2в6'3
уі3в’4є1
уі2в6’3
з3в'4я1
з2в6'3
з3в’4я1
з2в6’3
по3в'4я1
по3в’4я1
від3в'4я1
від2в6'3
від3в’4я1
від2в6’3
за3в'4я1
за3в’4я1
зі3в'4я1
зі3в’4я1
за3ю4ш
за3ю1
на3в'4я1
на2в6'3
на3в’4я1
на2в6’3
непо3в'4я1
неп2о1
непо2в6'3
непо3в’4я1
непо2в6’3
об3в'4я1
об2в6'3
об3в’4я1
об2в6’3
при3в'4я1
при2в6'3
при3в’4я1
при2в6’3
під3в'4я1
під2в6'3
під3в’4я1
під2в6’3
у3в'4я1
у2в6'3
у3в’4я1
у2в6’3
з3м'4я1
з2м6'3
з3м’4я1
з2м6’3
зі3м'4я1
зі2м6'3
зі3м’4я1
зі2м6’3
у3м'4я1
у2м6'3
у3м’4я1
у2м6’3
в3м'4я1
в2м6'3
в3м’4я1
в2м6’3
но3м'4я1
н2о1
но2м6'3
но3м’4я1
но2м6’3
за3м'4я1
за2м6'3
за3м’4я1
за2м6’3
на3м'4я1
на2м6'3
на3м’4я1
на2м6’3
об3м'4я1
об2м6'3
об3м’4я1
об2м6’3
пере3м'4я1
пере2м6'3
пере3м’4я1
пере2м6’3
по3м'4я1
по2м6'3
по3м’4я1
по2м6’3
при3м'4я1
при2м6'3
при3м’4я1
при2м6’3
піді3м'4я1
п2і1д2і1
піді2м6'3
піді3м’4я1
піді2м6’3
су3м'4я1
с2у1
су2м6'3
су3м’4я1
су2м6’3
до3в'4ю1
до3в’4ю1
за3в'4ю1
за3в’4ю1
зі3в'4ю1
зі3в’4ю1
на3в'4ю1
на3в’4ю1
по3в'4ю1
по3в’4ю1
уі3в'4ю1
уі3в’4ю1
інтер3в'4ю1
і2н1т
інт2е1
інте2р1в
інтер2в6'3
інтер3в’4ю1
інтер2в6’3
за3я4л2о1
за3я1
коу4роч
к2о1
ко3у1
коур2о1
зу4роч
з2у1
зур2о1
наду4роч
над2у1
надур2о1
позау4роч
поз2а1
поза3у1
позаур2о1
поу4роч
по3у1
поур2о1
приу4роч
при3у1
приур2о1
на4й3у4бог
на2й
най2у1
найуб2о1
нао4р
на3о1
прио4р
при3о1
неу4к
не3у1
3в4б4лаг
вбл2а1
3в4к4лад
вкл2а1
3в4п4лив
впл2и1
3в4п4ра2в1н
впр2а1
3в4р4одлив
вр2о1
вродл2и1
3в4т4рут
втр2у1
3в4т4руч
3з4б4ро2й
збр2о1
3з4б4ро3ю1
3з4б4ро3є1
3з4в4'4яз
3з4в4’4яз
3й4ш4л
3м4к4н2е1
3м4к4н2у1
3м4к4н2і1
3п4с4ков
пск2о1
3с4к4лад
скл2а1
3с4к4л2е1
3с4к4лит
скл2и1
3с4к4л2о1
3с4к4рипт
скр2и1
3с4п4лав
спл2а1
3с4п4лат
3с4п4лач
3с4п4рав
спр2а1
3с4п4ритн
с3п4р2и1
3с4п4рият
спри3я1
3с4п4р2о1м2о1
с3п4р2о1
3с4т4вор
ств2о1
3с4т4ражд
стр2а1
3с4т4рах
3с4т4риб
стр2и1
3с4т4риж
3с4т4ро2й
стр2о1
3с4т4рок
3с4т4ром
3с4т4роф
3с4т4роч
3с4т4ро3ю1
3с4т4ро3я1
3с4т4ро3є1
3с4т4ро3ї1
3с4т4рукт
стр2у1
3с4т4рукц
3с4т4рі2й
стр2і1
3с4т4ріл
3с4т4річ
3т4к4нен
ткн2е1
3т4ь4мар
тьм2а1
3т4ь4мян2і1
тьм2я1
3у4п4рав
упр2а1
3блаж
бл2а1
3ближ
бл2и1
3близ
3блиск
3блок
бл2о1
3блоц2і1
3бран
бр2а1
3брат2и1
3брест
бр2е1
3бри2з1к
бр2и1
3британ
брит2а1
3бруд
бр2у1
3в4бив
вб2и1
3в4веден
вв2е1
введ2е1
3в4дал
вд2а1
3в4до2в1з
вд2о1
3в4довол
вдов2о1
3в4живан
вж2и1
вжив2а1
3в4лад
вл2а1
3в4ласн
3в4лашт
3в4лов
вл2о1
3в4пе2в1н
вп2е1
3в4поряд
вп2о1
впор2я1
3в4разлив
вр2а1
вразл2и1
3в4рожа2й
врож2а1
3в4сюд
вс2ю1
3в4тіл
вт2і1
3глад
гл2а1
3глиб
гл2и1
3глин
3глоб
гл2о1
3глуз
гл2у1
3глуш
3гляд
гл2я1
3глян
3гнан
гн2а1
3гнил
гн2и1
3гноз
гн2о1
3гнучк
гн2у1
3грав
гр2а1
3град
3гра2й
3грам
3гран
3грат2и1
3граф
3граш
3гра3ю1
3гра3є1
3грес
гр2е1
3грец6ь
3гроб
гр2о1
3грож
3гроз
3громад
гром2а1
3груван
гр2у1
грув2а1
3гру2н1т
3груп
3грів
гр2і1
3гріт
3гріш
3г4ідр2о1
г2і1
3д4ан
д2а1
3д4бав
дб2а1
3д4бал
3д4бан
3д4бат
3д4ба3є1
3двиг
дв2и1
3дво3ю1
дв2о1
3дво3є1
3дві2й
дв2і1
3двір
3дв2і1ч2і1
3драж
др2а1
3дром
др2о1
3друж
др2у1
3друк
3дряп
др2я1
3дріб
др2і1
3дрім2а1
3жвав
жв2а1
3жміт6ь
жм2і1
3жріт6ь
жр2і1
3з4б2а1г2а1
зб2а1
3з4бала2н1с
збал2а1
3з4був
зб2у1
3з4бут
3зваж
зв2а1
3зван
3звед
зв2е1
3звел
3звест
3звис6ь
зв2и1
3звич
3звищ
3зворуш
зв2о1
звор2у1
3звук
зв2у1
3звуч
3звіт
зв2і1
3з4год
зг2о1
3з4дат
зд2а1
3з4до2в1ж
зд2о1
3з4доров
здор2о1
3з4дійсн
зд2і1
зді2й
зді2й1с
3змін
зм2і1
3зйом
з3й6о1
3зміш
3знав
зн2а1
3зна2й
3знак
3знал
3знан
3знат
3знаход
знах2о1
3знач
3зна3ю1
3зна3є1
3зниж
зн2и1
3знім
зн2і1
3зро5з4ум
зр2о1
зроз2у1
3зрюв
зр2ю1
3зрів
зр2і1
3зріл
3зрін
3з4чеп
зч2е1
3й4м2а1
3й4ме2н1н
йм2е1
3й4мищ
йм2и1
3й4мові2р1н
йм2о1
ймов2і1
3й4му.
йм2у1
3й4мут6ь
3й4міт6ь
йм2і1
3й4шов
йш2о1
3м4нож
мн2о1
3м4ріт6ь
мр2і1
3м4щен
мщ2е1
3п4сов
пс2о1
3п4сон
3п4сув
пс2у1
3р4вав
рв2а1
3р4ват2и1
3р4віт6ь
рв2і1
3с4кид
ск2и1
3с4кок
ск2о1
3с4коп
3с4кор
3с4короч
скор2о1
3с4коч
3с4кіл6ь
ск2і1
3с4кіпл
3с4пад
сп2а1
3с4пект
3с4пе2р1м
3с4пин
сп2и1
3с4пові4д3
сп2о1
спов2і1
3с4пожив
спож2и1
3с4постер
спост2е1
3с4піт6ь
3с4піш
3с4табіл
ст2а1
стаб2і1
3с4тав
3с4тад
3с4таз
3с4та2й1н
ста2й
3с4тал
3с4тан
3с4тар
3с4т2а1р2а1
3с4тат
3с4тач
3с4та3є1
3с4теп
ст2е1
3с4тереж
стер2е1
3с4теріг
стер2і1
3с4тиг
ст2и1
3с4тиж
3с4тисл
3с4тит2у1
3с4то2в1б
ст2о1
3с4то2й
3с4торон
стор2о1
3с4торін
стор2і1
3с4т2о1с2о1
3с4тос2у1
3с4то3ю1
3с4тоян
сто3я1
3с4туп
ст2у1
3с4тяг
ст2я1
3с4тіб
ст2і1
3с4ті2й
3с4тіл6ь
3с4тір
3с4фер
сф2е1
3с4хил
сх2и1
3с4хов
сх2о1
3с4хід
сх2і1
3т4кан
тк2а1
3х4т2о1
3ш4код
шк2о1
3ш4кол
3ш4кідл
шк2і1
3ш4кіл
3ш4кір
3ш4таб
шт2а1
3ш4туч
шт2у1
3ґру2н1т
ґр2у1
3а4вторит
а2в1т
авт2о1
автор2и1
3а4ге2н1т
аг2е1
3а4грес
агр2е1
3а4декват
ад2е1
адекв2а1
3а4дитив
ад2и1
адит2и1
3а4за2р1т
аз2а1
3а4ктив
акт2и1
3а4ктуал
акт2у1
2а1кту3а1
3а4курат
ак2у1
акур2а1
3а4куст
3а4кцепт
акц2е1
3а4кциз
акц2и1
3а4лерг2і1
ал2е1
але2р1г
3а4матор
ам2а1
амат2о1
3а4наліз
2а1н2а1
анал2і1
3а4натом
анат2о1
3а4парат
ап2а1
апар2а1
3а4пеляц
ап2е1
апел2я1
3а4постол
ап2о1
апост2о1
3а4птеч
апт2е1
3а4ргумен
а2р1г
арг2у1
аргум2е1
3а4ромат
ар2о1
аром2а1
3а4соц2і1
ас2о1
3а4с4пект
асп2е1
3а4тлет
атл2е1
3а4хал2і1
ах2а1
3е4колог
ек2о1
екол2о1
3е4коном
екон2о1
3е4лега2н1т
2е1л2е1
елег2а1
3е4лектр
3е4леме2н1т
елем2е1
